Utah statutes.
19-1-502.   Definitions.
(1)  "Bittering agent" means an aversive agent that renders engine coolant
unpalatable.
(2)  "Engine coolant" means:
(a)  a substance or preparation, regardless of its origin, used as the cooling
medium in the cooling system of an internal combustion engine to provide
protection against freezing, overheating, and corrosion of the cooling system;
or
(b)  a product that is labeled to indicate or imply that it will prevent
freezing or overheating of the cooling system of an internal combustion
engine.
